Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RECOVERY CAFE FROGTOWN.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Recovery Cafe Frogtown for increased programming and staff to provide support services for individuals impacted by substance use disorders, addiction, mental health challenges, and homelessness. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end